Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-9] Partition alternatives. (a)
If all the interests of all cotenants that requested partition by sale are not
purchased by other cotenants pursuant to section 668A-8, or if after conclusion
of the buyout under section 668A-8, a cotenant remains that has requested
partition in kind, the court shall order partition in kind unless the court,
after consideration of the factors listed in section 668A-10, finds that
partition in kind will result in great prejudice to the cotenants as a group.
In considering whether to order partition in kind, the court shall approve a
request by two or more parties to have their individual interests aggregated.

(b) If the court does not order partition in
kind under subsection (a), the court shall order partition by sale pursuant to
section 668A-11 or, if no cotenant requested partition by sale, the court shall
dismiss the action.

(c) If the court orders partition in kind
pursuant to subsection (a), the court may require that one or more cotenants
pay one or more other cotenants amounts so that the payments, taken together
with the value of the in-kind distributions to the cotenants, will make the
partition in kind just and proportionate in value to the fractional interests
held.

(d) If the court orders partition in kind, the
court shall allocate to the cotenants that are unknown, unlocatable, or are the
subject of a default judgment, a part of the property representing the combined
interests of these cotenants as determined by the court, and this part of the
property shall remain undivided; provided that their interests were not bought
out pursuant to section 668A-8. [L 2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next